src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
!! Noun inflection
!  ---------------
!! The Purubora language nouns inflect in number and cases.

LEXICON Cases
+Sg+Nom:   POSSESSION_     ;
! +Pl+Nom:i   #     ;
! +Sg+Acc:at  #     ;
! +Pl+Acc:iat #     ;
! +Sg+Loc:as  #     ;
! +Pl+Loc:ias #     ;
!         #:0   Nouns ; ! Normally going via a R lexicon adding compound tags.

LEXICON POSSESSION_
@R.PN.SG1@+PxSg1:@R.PN.SG1@ # ;!this [R]equires
@D.PN@ # ;! this [D]isallows

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
