src/fst/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
!! Nouns
!  -----
!! Nouns in the Purubora language refer to objects or sets of objects, qualities, states or ideas.

LEXICON Nouns
!noun+N:noun    Cases   ;
ʼâk+N:ʼâk Cases ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
